Illinois, session 104th, SB2053.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by changing Section 605-705 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-705)  (was 20 ILCS 605/46.6a)8    Sec. 605-705. Grants to local tourism and convention 9bureaus. 10    (a) To establish a grant program for local tourism and 11convention bureaus. The Department will develop and implement 12a program for the use of funds, as authorized under this Act, 13by local tourism and convention bureaus. For the purposes of 14this Act, bureaus eligible to receive funds are those local 15tourism and convention bureaus that are (i) either units of 16local government or incorporated as not-for-profit 17organizations; (ii) in legal existence for a minimum of 2 18years before July 1, 2001; (iii) operating with a paid, 19full-time staff whose sole purpose is to promote tourism in 20the designated service area; and (iv) affiliated with one or 21more municipalities or counties that support the bureau with 22local hotel-motel taxes. After July 1, 2001, bureaus 23requesting certification in order to receive funds for the   SB2053- 2 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1first time must be local tourism and convention bureaus that 2are (i) either units of local government or incorporated as 3not-for-profit organizations; (ii) in legal existence for a 4minimum of 2 years before the request for certification; (iii) 5operating with a paid, full-time staff whose sole purpose is 6to promote tourism in the designated service area; and (iv) 7affiliated with multiple municipalities or counties that 8support the bureau with local hotel-motel taxes. Each bureau 9receiving funds under this Act will be certified by the 10Department as the designated recipient to serve an area of the 11State. Notwithstanding the criteria set forth in this 12subsection (a), or any rule adopted under this subsection (a), 13the Director of the Department may provide for the award of 14grant funds to one or more entities if in the Department's 15judgment that action is necessary in order to prevent a loss of 16funding critical to promoting tourism in a designated 17geographic area of the State.18    (b) To distribute grants to local tourism and convention 19bureaus from appropriations made from the Local Tourism Fund 20for that purpose. Of the amounts appropriated annually to the 21Department for expenditure under this Section prior to July 1, 222011, one-third of those monies shall be used for grants to 23convention and tourism bureaus in cities with a population 24greater than 500,000. The remaining two-thirds of the annual 25appropriation prior to July 1, 2011 shall be used for grants to 26convention and tourism bureaus in the remainder of the State,   SB2053- 3 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1in accordance with a formula based upon the population served. 2Of the amounts appropriated annually to the Department for 3expenditure under this Section beginning July 1, 2011, 18% of 4such moneys shall be used for grants to convention and tourism 5bureaus in cities with a population greater than 500,000. Of 6the amounts appropriated annually to the Department for 7expenditure under this Section beginning July 1, 2011, 82% of 8such moneys shall be used for grants to convention bureaus in 9the remainder of the State, in accordance with a formula based 10upon the population served. The Department may reserve up to 113% of total local tourism funds available for costs of 12administering the program to conduct audits of grants, to 13provide incentive funds to those bureaus that will conduct 14promotional activities designed to further the Department's 15statewide advertising campaign, to fund special statewide 16promotional activities, and to fund promotional activities 17that support an increased use of the State's parks or historic 18sites. The Department shall require that any convention and 19tourism bureau receiving a grant under this Section that 20requires matching funds shall provide matching funds equal to 21no less than 50% of the grant amount, except that: (1) in 22Fiscal Years 2021 through 2024 only, the Department shall 23require that any convention and tourism bureau receiving a 24grant under this Section that requires matching funds shall 25provide matching funds equal to no less than 25% of the grant 26amount; (2) in Fiscal Year 2025, the Department shall require   SB2053- 4 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1that any convention and tourism bureau receiving a grant under 2this Section that requires matching funds shall provide 3matching funds equal to no less than 30% of the grant amount; 4and (3) in Fiscal Year 2026 and thereafter, the Department 5shall require that any convention and tourism bureau receiving 6a grant under this Section that requires matching funds shall 7provide matching funds equal to no less than 25% 40% of the 8grant amount. During fiscal year 2013, the Department shall 9reserve $2,000,000 of the available local tourism funds for 10appropriation to the Historic Preservation Agency for the 11operation of the Abraham Lincoln Presidential Library and 12Museum and State historic sites. 13    To provide for the expeditious and timely implementation 14of the changes made by Public Act 101-636, emergency rules to 15implement the changes made by Public Act 101-636 may be 16adopted by the Department subject to the provisions of Section 175-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 18(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 19103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 20    Section 10. The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act is 21amended by changing Section 6 as follows: 22    (35 ILCS 145/6)  (from Ch. 120, par. 481b.36)23    Sec. 6. Returns; allocation of proceeds. 24    (a) Except as provided hereinafter in this Section, on or   SB2053- 5 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1before the last day of each calendar month, every person 2engaged as a hotel operator in this State during the preceding 3calendar month shall file a return with the Department, 4stating:5        1. the name of the operator;6        2. his residence address and the address of his 7    principal place of business and the address of the 8    principal place of business (if that is a different 9    address) from which he engages in business as a hotel 10    operator in this State (including, if required by the 11    Department, the address of each hotel from which rental 12    receipts were received);13        3. total amount of rental receipts received by him 14    during the preceding calendar month from engaging in 15    business as a hotel operator during such preceding 16    calendar month;17        4. total amount of rental receipts received by him 18    during the preceding calendar month from renting, leasing 19    or letting rooms to permanent residents during such 20    preceding calendar month;21        5. total amount of other exclusions from gross rental 22    receipts allowed by this Act;23        6. gross rental receipts which were received by him 24    during the preceding calendar month and upon the basis of 25    which the tax is imposed;26        7. the amount of tax due;  SB2053- 6 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1        8. credit for any reimbursement of tax paid by a 2    re-renter of hotel rooms to hotel operators for rentals 3    purchased for re-rental, as provided in Section 3-3 of 4    this Act; 5        9. such other reasonable information as the Department 6    may require.7    If the operator's average monthly tax liability to the 8Department does not exceed $200, the Department may authorize 9his returns to be filed on a quarter annual basis, with the 10return for January, February and March of a given year being 11due by April 30 of such year; with the return for April, May 12and June of a given year being due by July 31 of such year; 13with the return for July, August and September of a given year 14being due by October 31 of such year, and with the return for 15October, November and December of a given year being due by 16January 31 of the following year.17    If the operator's average monthly tax liability to the 18Department does not exceed $50, the Department may authorize 19his returns to be filed on an annual basis, with the return for 20a given year being due by January 31 of the following year.21    Such quarter annual and annual returns, as to form and 22substance, shall be subject to the same requirements as 23monthly returns.24    Notwithstanding any other provision in this Act concerning 25the time within which an operator may file his return, in the 26case of any operator who ceases to engage in a kind of business   SB2053- 7 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1which makes him responsible for filing returns under this Act, 2such operator shall file a final return under this Act with the 3Department not more than one 1 month after discontinuing such 4business.5    Where the same person has more than one 1 business 6registered with the Department under separate registrations 7under this Act, such person shall not file each return that is 8due as a single return covering all such registered 9businesses, but shall file separate returns for each such 10registered business.11    In his return, the operator shall determine the value of 12any consideration other than money received by him in 13connection with engaging in business as a hotel operator and 14he shall include such value in his return. Such determination 15shall be subject to review and revision by the Department in 16the manner hereinafter provided for the correction of returns.17    Where the operator is a corporation, the return filed on 18behalf of such corporation shall be signed by the president, 19vice-president, secretary or treasurer or by the properly 20accredited agent of such corporation.21    The person filing the return herein provided for shall, at 22the time of filing such return, pay to the Department the 23amount of tax herein imposed. The operator filing the return 24under this Section shall, at the time of filing such return, 25pay to the Department the amount of tax imposed by this Act 26less a discount of 2.1% or $25 per calendar year, whichever is   SB2053- 8 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1greater, which is allowed to reimburse the operator for the 2expenses incurred in keeping records, preparing and filing 3returns, remitting the tax and supplying data to the 4Department on request.5    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 6operator's liabilities under this Act, as shown on an original 7return, the Department may authorize the operator to credit 8such excess payment against liability subsequently to be 9remitted to the Department under this Act, in accordance with 10reasonable rules adopted by the Department. If the Department 11subsequently determines that all or any part of the credit 12taken was not actually due to the operator, the operator's 13discount shall be reduced by an amount equal to the difference 14between the discount as applied to the credit taken and that 15actually due, and that operator shall be liable for penalties 16and interest on such difference. 17    (b) Until July 1, 2024, the Department shall deposit the 18total net revenue realized from the tax imposed under this Act 19as provided in this subsection (b). Beginning on July 1, 2024, 20the Department shall deposit the total net revenue realized 21from the tax imposed under this Act as provided in subsection 22(c). 23    There shall be deposited into the Build Illinois Fund in 24the State treasury Treasury for each State fiscal year 40% of 25the amount of total net revenue from the tax imposed by 26subsection (a) of Section 3. Of the remaining 60%: (i)   SB2053- 9 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1$5,000,000 shall be deposited into the Illinois Sports 2Facilities Fund and credited to the Subsidy Account each 3fiscal year by making monthly deposits in the amount of 1/8 of 4$5,000,000 plus cumulative deficiencies in such deposits for 5prior months, and (ii) an amount equal to the then applicable 6Advance Amount, as defined in subsection (d), shall be 7deposited into the Illinois Sports Facilities Fund and 8credited to the Advance Account each fiscal year by making 9monthly deposits in the amount of 1/8 of the then applicable 10Advance Amount plus any cumulative deficiencies in such 11deposits for prior months. (The deposits of the then 12applicable Advance Amount during each fiscal year shall be 13treated as advances of funds to the Illinois Sports Facilities 14Authority for its corporate purposes to the extent paid to the 15Authority or its trustee and shall be repaid into the General 16Revenue Fund in the State treasury Treasury by the State 17Treasurer on behalf of the Authority pursuant to Section 19 of 18the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, as amended. If 19in any fiscal year the full amount of the then applicable 20Advance Amount is not repaid into the General Revenue Fund, 21then the deficiency shall be paid from the amount in the Local 22Government Distributive Fund that would otherwise be allocated 23to the City of Chicago under the State Revenue Sharing Act.)24    Of the remaining 60% of the amount of total net revenue 25beginning on August 1, 2011 through June 30, 2023, from the tax 26imposed by subsection (a) of Section 3 after all required   SB2053- 10 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1deposits into the Illinois Sports Facilities Fund, an amount 2equal to 8% of the net revenue realized from this Act during 3the preceding month shall be deposited as follows: 18% of such 4amount shall be deposited into the Chicago Travel Industry 5Promotion Fund for the purposes described in subsection (n) of 6Section 5 of the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority 7Act and the remaining 82% of such amount shall be deposited 8into the Local Tourism Fund each month for purposes authorized 9by Section 605-705 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity Law. Beginning on August 1, 2011 and through June 1130, 2023, an amount equal to 4.5% of the net revenue realized 12from this Act during the preceding month shall be deposited as 13follows: 55% of such amount shall be deposited into the 14Chicago Travel Industry Promotion Fund for the purposes 15described in subsection (n) of Section 5 of the Metropolitan 16Pier and Exposition Authority Act and the remaining 45% of 17such amount deposited into the International Tourism Fund for 18the purposes authorized in Section 605-707 of the Department 19of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law. 20    Beginning on July 1, 2023 and until July 1, 2024, of the 21remaining 60% of the amount of total net revenue realized from 22the tax imposed under subsection (a) of Section 3, after all 23required deposits into the Illinois Sports Facilities Fund: 24        (1) an amount equal to 8% of the net revenue realized 25    under this Act for the preceding month shall be deposited 26    as follows: 82% to the Local Tourism Fund and 18% to the   SB2053- 11 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1    Chicago Travel Industry Promotion Fund; and2        (2) an amount equal to 4.5% of the net revenue 3    realized under this Act for the preceding month shall be 4    deposited as follows: 55% to the Chicago Travel Industry 5    Promotion Fund and 45% to the International Tourism Fund. 6    After making all these deposits, any remaining net revenue 7realized from the tax imposed under subsection (a) of Section 83 shall be deposited into the Tourism Promotion Fund in the 9State treasury Treasury. All moneys received by the Department 10from the additional tax imposed under subsection (b) of 11Section 3 shall be deposited into the Build Illinois Fund in 12the State treasury Treasury.13    (c) Beginning on July 1, 2024, the total net revenue 14realized from the tax imposed under this Act for the preceding 15month shall be deposited each month as follows: 16        (1) 50% shall be deposited into the Build Illinois 17    Fund; and 18        (2) the remaining 50% shall be deposited in the 19    following order of priority: 20            (A) First: 21                (i) $5,000,000 shall be deposited into the 22            Illinois Sports Facilities Fund and credited to 23            the Subsidy Account each fiscal year by making 24            monthly deposits in the amount of one-eighth of 25            $5,000,000 plus cumulative deficiencies in those 26            deposits for prior months; and   SB2053- 12 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1                (ii) an amount equal to the then applicable 2            Advance Amount, as defined in subsection (d), 3            shall be deposited into the Illinois Sports 4            Facilities Fund and credited to the Advance 5            Account each fiscal year by making monthly 6            deposits in the amount of one-eighth of the then 7            applicable Advance Amount plus any cumulative 8            deficiencies in such deposits for prior months; 9            the deposits of the then applicable Advance Amount 10            during each fiscal year shall be treated as 11            advances of funds to the Illinois Sports 12            Facilities Authority for its corporate purposes to 13            the extent paid to the Illinois Sports Facilities 14            Authority or its trustee and shall be repaid into 15            the General Revenue Fund in the State Treasury by 16            the State Treasurer on behalf of the Authority 17            pursuant to Section 19 of the Illinois Sports 18            Facilities Authority Act as provided in item (iii) 19            of this paragraph (A); if, in any fiscal year, the 20            full amount of the Advance Amount is not repaid 21            into the General Revenue Fund, then the deficiency 22            shall be paid from the amount in the Local 23            Government Distributive Fund that would otherwise 24            be allocated to the City of Chicago under the 25            State Revenue Sharing Act; and 26            (iii) beginning on July 1, 2024 and until July 1,   SB2053- 13 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1            2025, the amount repaid by the State Treasurer on 2            behalf of the Authority pursuant to Section 19 of 3            the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act shall 4            be deposited into the General Revenue Fund; 5            beginning on July 1, 2025 and until July 1, 2026, 6            from the amount repaid by the State Treasurer on 7            behalf of the Authority pursuant to Section 19 of 8            the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, 9            $77,916,800 shall be deposited into the General 10            Revenue Fund and all additional amounts repaid 11            shall be deposited into the Local Tourism Fund; 12            beginning on July 1, 2026, from the amount repaid 13            by the State Treasurer on behalf of the Authority 14            pursuant to Section 19 of the Illinois Sports 15            Facilities Authority Act, $77,916,800 shall be 16            deposited into the General Revenue Fund, 17            $4,142,400 shall be deposited into the Local 18            Tourism Fund, and all additional amounts repaid 19            shall be deposited as follows: 56% into the 20            Tourism Promotion Fund; 23% into the Local Tourism 21            Fund; 14% into the Chicago Travel Industry 22            Promotion Fund; and 7% into the International 23            Tourism Fund; and 24            (B) after all required deposits into the Illinois 25        Sports Facilities Fund under paragraph (A) have been 26        made each month, the remainder shall be deposited as   SB2053- 14 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1        follows: 2                (i) 56% into the Tourism Promotion Fund; 3                (ii) 23% into the Local Tourism Fund; 4                (iii) 14% into the Chicago Travel Industry 5            Promotion Fund; and 6                (iv) 7% into the International Tourism Fund. 7    (d) As used in subsections (b) and (c): 8    "Advance Amount" means, for fiscal year 2002, $22,179,000, 9and for subsequent fiscal years through fiscal year 2033, 10105.615% of the Advance Amount for the immediately preceding 11fiscal year, rounded up to the nearest $1,000. 12    "Net revenue realized" means the revenue collected by the 13State under this Act less the amount paid out as refunds to 14taxpayers for overpayment of liability under this Act. 15    (e) The Department may, upon separate written notice to a 16taxpayer, require the taxpayer to prepare and file with the 17Department on a form prescribed by the Department within not 18less than 60 days after receipt of the notice an annual 19information return for the tax year specified in the notice. 20Such annual return to the Department shall include a statement 21of gross receipts as shown by the operator's last State income 22tax return. If the total receipts of the business as reported 23in the State income tax return do not agree with the gross 24receipts reported to the Department for the same period, the 25operator shall attach to his annual information return a 26schedule showing a reconciliation of the 2 amounts and the   SB2053- 15 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1reasons for the difference. The operator's annual information 2return to the Department shall also disclose payroll 3information of the operator's business during the year covered 4by such return and any additional reasonable information which 5the Department deems would be helpful in determining the 6accuracy of the monthly, quarterly or annual tax returns by 7such operator as hereinbefore provided for in this Section.8    If the annual information return required by this Section 9is not filed when and as required the taxpayer shall be liable 10for a penalty in an amount determined in accordance with 11Section 3-4 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act until such 12return is filed as required, the penalty to be assessed and 13collected in the same manner as any other penalty provided for 14in this Act.15    The chief executive officer, proprietor, owner or highest 16ranking manager shall sign the annual return to certify the 17accuracy of the information contained therein. Any person who 18willfully signs the annual return containing false or 19inaccurate information shall be guilty of perjury and punished 20accordingly. The annual return form prescribed by the 21Department shall include a warning that the person signing the 22return may be liable for perjury.23    The foregoing portion of this Section concerning the 24filing of an annual information return shall not apply to an 25operator who is not required to file an income tax return with 26the United States Government.  SB2053- 16 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 2103-592, eff. 7-1-24; 103-642, eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-12-24.) 3    Section 15. The Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act 4is amended by changing Section 19 as follows: 5    (70 ILCS 3205/19)  (from Ch. 85, par. 6019)6    Sec. 19. Tax. The Authority may impose an occupation tax 7upon all hotel operators in the City of Chicago, as defined in 8The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act, at a rate not to 9exceed 2% of the gross rental receipts from engaging in 10business as a hotel operator within the City of Chicago, 11excluding, however, from gross rental receipts, the proceeds 12of such renting, leasing or letting of hotel rooms to 13permanent residents of a hotel and proceeds from the tax 14imposed under subsection (c) of Section 13 of the Metropolitan 15Pier and Exposition Authority Act.16    The tax imposed by the Authority pursuant to this Section 17and all civil penalties that may be assessed as an incident 18thereof shall be collected and enforced by the State 19Department of Revenue. The certificate of registration which 20is issued by the Department to a lessor under The Hotel 21Operators' Occupation Tax Act shall permit such registrant to 22engage in a business which is taxable under any ordinance or 23resolution enacted pursuant to this Section without 24registering separately with the Department under such   SB2053- 17 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1ordinance or resolution or under this Section. The Department 2shall have full power to administer and enforce this Section; 3to collect all taxes and penalties due hereunder; to dispose 4of taxes and penalties so collected in the manner provided in 5this Section, and to determine all rights to credit memoranda, 6arising on account of the erroneous payment of tax or penalty 7hereunder. In the administration of, and compliance with, this 8Section, the Department and persons who are subject to this 9Section shall have the same rights, remedies, privileges, 10immunities, powers and duties, and be subject to the same 11conditions, restrictions, limitations, penalties and 12definitions of terms, and employ the same modes of procedure, 13as are prescribed in The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act 14(except where that Act is inconsistent herewith), as the same 15is now or may hereafter be amended, as fully as if the 16provisions contained in The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax 17Act were set forth herein.18    Whenever the Department determines that a refund should be 19made under this Section to a claimant instead of issuing a 20credit memorandum, the Department shall notify the State 21Comptroller, who shall cause the warrant to be drawn for the 22amount specified, and to the person named, in such 23notification from the Department. Such refund shall be paid by 24the State Treasurer out of the amounts held by the State 25Treasurer as trustee for the Authority.26    Persons subject to any tax imposed pursuant to authority   SB2053- 18 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1granted by this Section may reimburse themselves for their tax 2liability for such tax by separately stating such tax as an 3additional charge, which charge may be stated in combination, 4in a single amount, with State tax imposed under The Hotel 5Operators' Occupation Tax Act, the municipal tax imposed under 6Section 8-3-13 of the Illinois Municipal Code, and the tax 7imposed under Section 13 of the Metropolitan Pier and 8Exposition Authority Act.9    The Department shall forthwith pay over to the State 10Treasurer, ex-officio, as trustee for the Authority, all taxes 11and penalties collected hereunder for deposit in a trust fund 12outside the State Treasury. On or before the 25th day of each 13calendar month, the Department shall certify to the 14Comptroller the amount to be paid to or on behalf of the 15Authority from amounts collected hereunder by the Department, 16and deposited into such trust fund during the second preceding 17calendar month. The amount to be paid to or on behalf of the 18Authority shall be the amount (not including credit memoranda) 19collected hereunder during such second preceding calendar 20month by the Department, less an amount equal to the amount of 21refunds authorized during such second preceding calendar month 22by the Department on behalf of the Authority, and less 4% of 23such balance, which sum shall be retained by the State 24Treasurer to cover the costs incurred by the Department in 25administering and enforcing the provisions of this Section, as 26provided herein. Each such monthly certification by the   SB2053- 19 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1Department shall also certify to the Comptroller the amount to 2be so retained by the State Treasurer for payment as provided 3in Section 6 of the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act into 4the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury.5    Each monthly certification by the Department shall 6certify, of the amount paid to or on behalf of the Authority, 7(i) the portion to be paid to the Authority, (ii) the portion 8to be paid into the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury 9on behalf of the Authority as provided in Section 6 of the 10Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act as repayment of amounts 11advanced to the Authority pursuant to appropriation from the 12Illinois Sports Facilities Fund.13    With respect to each State fiscal year, of the total 14amount to be paid to or on behalf of the Authority, the 15Department shall certify that payments shall first be made 16directly to the Authority in an amount equal to any difference 17between the annual amount certified by the Chairman of the 18Authority pursuant to Section 8.25-4 of the State Finance Act 19and the amount appropriated to the Authority from the Illinois 20Sports Facilities Fund. Next, the Department shall certify 21that payment shall be made as provided in Section 6 of the 22Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act into the General Revenue 23Fund of the State Treasury in an amount equal to the difference 24between (i) the lesser of (x) the amount appropriated from the 25Illinois Sports Facilities Fund to the Authority and (y) the 26annual amount certified by the Chairman of the Authority   SB2053- 20 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1pursuant to Section 8.25-4 of the State Finance Act and (ii) 2$10,000,000. The Department shall certify that all additional 3amounts shall be paid to the Authority and used for its 4corporate purposes.5    Within 10 days after receipt, by the Comptroller, of the 6Department's monthly certification of amounts to be paid to or 7on behalf of the Authority and amounts to be paid into the 8General Revenue Fund, the Comptroller shall cause the warrants 9to be drawn for the respective amounts in accordance with the 10directions contained in such certification.11    Amounts collected by the Department and paid to the 12Authority pursuant to this Section shall be used for the 13corporate purposes of the Authority. On June 15, 1992 and on 14each June 15 thereafter, the Authority shall repay to the 15State Treasurer all amounts paid to it under this Section and 16otherwise remaining available to the Authority after providing 17for (i) payment of principal and interest on, and other 18payments related to, its obligations issued or to be issued 19under Section 13 of the Act, including any deposits required 20to reserve funds created under any indenture or resolution 21authorizing issuance of the obligations and payments to 22providers of credit enhancement, (ii) payment of obligations 23under the provisions of any management agreement with respect 24to a facility or facilities owned by the Authority or of any 25assistance agreement with respect to any facility for which 26financial assistance is provided under this Act, and payment   SB2053- 21 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1of other capital and operating expenses of the Authority, 2including any deposits required to reserve funds created for 3repair and replacement of capital assets and to meet the 4obligations of the Authority under any management agreement or 5assistance agreement. Amounts repaid by the Authority to the 6State Treasurer hereunder shall be treated as repayment of 7amounts deposited into the Illinois Sports Facilities Fund and 8credited to the Subsidy Account and used for the corporate 9purposes of the Authority. The State Treasurer shall deposit 10$5,000,000 of the amount received into the General Revenue 11Fund; thereafter, at the beginning of each fiscal year the 12State Treasurer shall certify to the State Comptroller for all 13prior fiscal years the cumulative amount of any deficiencies 14in repayments to the City of Chicago of amounts in the Local 15Government Distributive Fund that would otherwise have been 16allocated to the City of Chicago under the State Revenue 17Sharing Act but instead were paid into the General Revenue 18Fund under Section 6 of the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax 19Act and that have not been reimbursed, and the Comptroller 20shall, during the fiscal year at the beginning of which the 21certification was made, cause warrants to be drawn from the 22amount received for the repayment of that cumulative amount to 23the City of Chicago until that cumulative amount has been 24fully reimbursed; thereafter, the State Treasurer shall 25deposit the balance of the amount received into the trust fund 26established outside the State Treasury under subsection (g) of   SB2053- 22 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1Section 13 of the Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority 2Act.3    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize 4the Authority to impose a tax upon the privilege of engaging in 5any business which under the constitution of the United States 6may not be made the subject of taxation by this State.7    An ordinance or resolution imposing or discontinuing a tax 8hereunder or effecting a change in the rate thereof shall be 9effective on the first day of the second calendar month next 10following the month in which the ordinance or resolution is 11passed.12    If the Authority levies a tax authorized by this Section 13it shall transmit to the Department of Revenue not later than 5 14days after the adoption of the ordinance or resolution a 15certified copy of the ordinance or resolution imposing such 16tax whereupon the Department of Revenue shall proceed to 17administer and enforce this Section on behalf of the 18Authority. Upon a change in rate of a tax levied hereunder, or 19upon the discontinuance of the tax, the Authority shall not 20later than 5 days after the effective date of the ordinance or 21resolution discontinuing the tax or effecting a change in rate 22transmit to the Department of Revenue a certified copy of the 23ordinance or resolution effecting such change or 24discontinuance.25(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 7-1-24.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB2053- 23 -LRB104 08029 HLH 18075 b1becoming law.